Oklahoma, session 2025, SB799.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY Section 1, Chapter 297, O.S.L.
2024 (70 O.S. Supp. 2024, Section 6-401), is amended to read as
follows:
Section 6-401. A. As used in this section:
1. “Electronic or digital communication” includes, but is not
limited to, emails, text messages, instant messages, direct
messages, social media messages, messages sent through software
applications, and any other electronic digital means of
communication; and
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB799 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

2. “School personnel” means teachers, coaches, administrators,
school bus drivers, or any other persons employed full-time or part-
time by a public school or charter school.
B. 1. School personnel engaging in electronic or digital
communication with an individual student shall include the student’s
parent or, guardian, or alternate adult provided for in paragraph 2
of this subsection in any electronic or digital communication,
unless such communication is on a school-approved platform and
related to school and academic communications.
2. Students who are known to be homeless children and youth as
defined in Section 600 of Title 10 of the Oklahoma Statutes shall,
in lieu of a parent or guardian, have an alternate adult included in
the electronic or digital communication. The alternate adult shall
be:
a. the McKinney-Vento homeless liaison of a public
school, or
b. a case manager or designated employee of a homeless
shelter, transitional living program, or a continuum
of care lead agency.
C. Exceptions to the requirement in subsection B of this
section may be made in case of an emergency, subject to subsequent
notification to the parent or, guardian, or alternate adult provided
for in paragraph 2 of subsection B of this section. The provisions

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB799 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

of s ubsection B of this section shall not apply to the alternate
adult provided for in paragraph 2 of subsection B of this section.
D. School personnel shall make reasonable efforts to use
school-approved platforms, systems, or applications that allow
automatic inclusion of parents or, guardians, or alternate adults
provided for in paragraph 2 of subsection B of this section in
communications with students.
D. E. Schools shall provide training, developed by the State
Department of Education, for school personnel on the student
communication requirements of this section.
E. F. Any school personnel who is reported to be in violation
of subsection B of this section shall be put on administrative leave
while the school district investigates the incident and notifies the
board of education. If the investigation finds that no misconduct
occurred, the school personnel shall be reinstated and the incident
shall be noted in the school personnel’s employee file. If the
investigation finds misconduct occurred, the school personnel shall
be disciplined according to the school district board of education’s
policy, up to and including termination of employment, and the
incident shall be reported to law enforcement pursuant to Section
1210.163 of Title 70 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.
SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health, or safety, an emergency is hereby
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB799 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

decl ared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON EDUCATION
March 4, 2025 - DO PASS AS AMENDED BY CS





















SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB799 SFLR Page 4
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)